Nebraska, session 109, LB459.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB459 LB459
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that
Nebraska is experiencing a persistent and present crisis in regards to
affordable quality housing, as evidenced by lower inventory than required
to support and sustain a healthy housing market. Housing inventory and
availability are critical elements in population attraction and
retention, workforce development, economic development, and individual
family health and economic self-sufficiency. In addition to housing
inventory and the availability of homes, another factor that may hinder
population attraction is the quality of homes. One measurement of housing
quality is age. As such, Nebraska must streamline and maximize all
existing housing, weatherization, and home improvement programs to expand
access to affordable quality homes and renovate and modernize existing
aging housing inventory to meet modern standards.
(2) The Home Weatherization Clearinghouse is established within the
Department of Environment and Energy.
(3) The clearinghouse shall:
(a) Serve as a primary contact point for persons applying for
grants, loans, or other programs that fund home weatherization projects,
whether administered by the department, other state or local agencies,
nonprofits, or the federal government;
(b) Serve as a coordinator for other state and local agencies
administering or applying for any such grants, loans, or programs; and
(c) Coordinate efforts by state and local agencies to maximize the
receipt of federal dollars for home weatherization projects.
(4) The clearinghouse shall have as its primary focus the
facilitation of funding for whole-home rehabilitation projects. As such,
all grants that accomplish whole-home rehabilitation projects shall be
given priority for grant funding to the maximum extent allowed under the
relevant federal, state, or local grant program. Additionally,
administrative costs for public or nonprofit entities administering such
grant programs shall never exceed ten percent of program costs unless
-2-

LB459 LB459
2025 2025
expressly required under the relevant federal, state, or local grant
program.
-3-